Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
249

COUNTY
VEHICULAR TAXES

Vehicle Weight Tax

Section

249-1 Definitions

249-2 Imposition of tax

249-3, 3.5 Repealed

249-4 Exemptions for new vehicles and official
vehicles

249-5 Repealed

249-5.5 Stored vehicles

249-6 Exemptions for certain cars furnished to
disabled

veterans

249-6.5 Exemption for National Guard, military
reserves,

and other active duty military personnel
claiming

Hawaii as their residence of record

249-7 Number plates

249-7.5 New motor vehicle with a temporary number
plate

249-8 Replacements for lost or damaged plates,
tags, or

emblems

249-9 Number plates; purchase

249-9.1 Special number plates

249-9.2 Special number plates; military service

249-9.3 Special number plates; design and issuance
by counties

249-9.4 Special series number plates

249-9.5 Special number plates for Haleakala
National Park and

Hawaii Volcanoes National Park authorized

249-10 Delinquent penalties; seizure and sale for
tax

249-11 Fraudulent use of plates, tags, or emblems
and other

misdemeanors; penalties

249-12 Standard size license plates

249-13 Determination of rate

Bicycles and Mopeds

249-14 Bicycle fee

249-14.1 Number plates for mopeds; registration

249-14.5 New bicycles and mopeds

249-15 Seizure and sale

249-16 Duplicate bicycle tag; duplicate moped
license plate

and tag; and duplicate certificates of
registration

249-17 False tag, license plate, bicycle or
moped, penalty

249-17.5 Bikeway fund; established

Disposition of Taxes

249-18 Highway fund

Other Levies

249-31 State registration fee

249-31.5 Exemptions from registration fees for
certain

vehicles; disabled veterans

249-32 Repealed

249-33 State vehicle weight tax, exemptions

249-34 Delinquent penalties; seizure and sale for
tax and fee

Revision Note

Throughout this chapter, "director of finance" and
"council" have been substituted for "treasurer" and
"board of supervisors" to conform to county charters.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next